District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-1812.11a

Tax check-off.

Repealed.

History

July 16, 1947, ch. 258, art. I, title XII, § 11a
as added Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-246, § 6, 38 DCR 371
Nov. 20, 1993, D.C. Law 10-56, § 10, 40 DCR 7222
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-236, § 2(c)(2), 46 DCR 660

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1812.11a.